Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2149
Recovery by receiver.

(1) If an order for rehabilitation or liquidation of a domestic insurer has been entered, the receiver appointed under such order shall have a right to recover on behalf of the insurer (a) from any parent or holding company or person or affiliate who otherwise controlled the insurer, the amount of any distribution, other than distribution of shares of the same class of stock, paid by the insurer on its capital stock or (b) any payment in the form of a bonus, termination settlement, or extraordinary lump-sum salary adjustment made by the insurer or its subsidiary to a director, officer, or employee, when the distribution or payment pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of this subsection is made at any time during the one year preceding the filing of the petition for rehabilitation or liquidation subject to the limitations of subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section.

(2) No such distribution or payment shall be recoverable if the parent or affiliate shows that when paid such distribution or payment was lawful and reasonable and that the insurer did not know and could not reasonably have known that such distribution or payment might adversely affect the ability of the insurer to fulfill its contractual obligations.

(3) Any person who was a parent or holding company or a person who otherwise controlled the insurer or affiliate at the time such distribution or payment was paid shall be liable up to the amount of distribution or payment under subsection (1) of this section such person received. Any person who otherwise controlled the insurer at the time such distribution or payment was declared shall be liable up to the amount of distribution or payment he would have received if it had been paid immediately. If two or more persons are liable with respect to the same distribution or payment, they shall be jointly and severally liable.

(4) The maximum amount recoverable under subsection (3) of this section shall be the amount needed in excess of all other available assets of the impaired or insolvent insurer to pay the contractual obligations of the impaired or insolvent insurer and to reimburse any guaranty funds.

(5) To the extent that any person liable under subsection (3) of this section is insolvent or otherwise fails to pay claims due from it pursuant to such subsection, its parent or holding company or the person who otherwise controlled it at the time the distribution or payment was paid shall be jointly and severally liable for any resulting deficiency in the amount recovered from such parent or holding company or person who otherwise controlled it.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 29.